lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/verb-suffixing/verb-derivSuffix_finalE.txt
!=================
LEXICON NegationII
!=================
0:0                                            ModalII;
^@~%:(ng)igate(V→V):^%{.f.%}iga%{t%}e**        ModalVI; ! to never V; to not be V-ing at the present time
^@laaghigate(V→V):^laaghiga%{t%}e**            ModalVI; ! to seldom V; to infrequently V; to not V enough; inadequately V
^–pagigate(V→V):^pagiga%{t%}e**                ModalVI; ! to V infrequently; to seldom V 
^–qiigate(V→V):^qiiga%{t%}e**                  ModalVI; ! to never briefly V
^~%:(ng)ite(V→V):^%{.f.%}ngi%{t%}e**           ModalVI; ! to lack the quality of V 
^–pagite(V→V):^pagi%{t%}e**                    ModalVI; ! for there not to be much V-ness
^–ketiite(V→V):^ketii%{t%}e**                  ModalVI; ! to not tend to V 
^–llgite(V→V):^llgi%{t%}e**                    ModalVI; ! to V poorly
^–llgiite(V→V):^llgii%{t%}e**                  ModalVI; ! to become a poor V-er
^@~%:(i/u)mangite(V→V):^%{.f.%}umangi%{t%}e**  ModalVI; ! to not have V-ed
^–pagumangite(V→V):^pagumangi%{t%}e**          ModalVI; ! to not have V-ed so much
^@~fniite(V→V):^%{.f.%}nii%{t%}e**             ModalVI; ! to not cause one to V
^@~fnaanghite(V→V):^%{.f.%}naanghi%{t%}e*      ModalVI; ! to not V in the future; won't V
^–pagnaanghite(V→V):^pagnaanghi%{t%}e**        ModalVI; ! to not V too much, very much in the future 
^@–nghite(V→V):^nghi%{t%}e**                   ModalVI; ! to not V
^+panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                ModalVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^–panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                ModalVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^+pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**            ModalVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**            ModalVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–llghite(V→V):^llghi%{t%}e**                  ModalVI; ! to not V
^+pagningite(V→V):^pagningi%{t%}e**            ModalVI; ! to not be able to V; cannot V
^+yaghqiite(V→V):^yaghqii%{t%}e**              ModalVI; ! to not to have to V
^@~f–yiite(V→V):^%{.f.%}yii%{t%}e**            ModalVI; ! to poorly V habitually
^+yugniite(V→V):^yugnii%{t%}e**                ModalVI; ! to not find it easy to V; to not want to V
^@~fnanigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}nanigh                 ModalIV; ! to cease V-ing; to stop V-ing; to quit V-ing
^@~fnanighqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}nanighqe             ModalII; ! to make one cease V-ing


!--------------------
! the auxiliary node
!--------------------

!==============
LEXICON ModalII
!==============
0:0                                     InterModalPastII;
^@~–(g)kayugu(V→V):^gkayugu             InterModalPastI;  ! to be able to V; can V
^@~–(g)kayugu(V→V):^%{.f.%}kayugu       InterModalPastI;  ! to be able to V; can V
^@~fnaqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}naqe              InterModalPastII; ! to be going to V in the near future; to try to V
^@~fnaqlaatagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}naqlaatagh  InterModalPastIV; ! to V again be going to V
^–qaghnaqe(V→V):^qaghnaqe               InterModalPastII; ! to be about to V for a moment 
^@~fna(V→V):^%{.f.%}na                  InterModalPastI;  ! in order to V; to V 
^@~fnaqngu(V→V):^%{.f.%}naqngu          InterModalPastI;  ! to have to V
^@~fyaghqaqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaghqaqe      InterModalPastII; ! to need to V; to be supposed to V; to V in the future
^@~fyaghqaa(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaghqaa        InterModalPastI;  ! to need to V; to be supposed to V; to V in the future
^@~fyaghqau(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaghqau        InterModalPastI;  ! to need to V; to be supposed to V; to V in the future
^@~fnayagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}nayagh          InterModalPastIV; ! could V; might V; should V; would V
^–qaghnayagh(V→V):^qaghnayagh           InterModalPastIV; ! would V for a short time


!=======================
LEXICON InterModalPastII
!=======================
0:0                                            PastTenseII;
^@~%:(ng)igate(V→V):^%{.f.%}iga%{t%}e**        PastTenseVI; ! to never V; to not be V-ing at the present time
^@laaghigate(V→V):^laaghiga%{t%}e**            PastTenseVI; ! to seldom V; to infrequently V; to not V enough; inadequately V
^–pagigate(V→V):^pagiga%{t%}e**                PastTenseVI; ! to V infrequently; to seldom V 
^–qiigate(V→V):^qiiga%{t%}e**                  PastTenseVI; ! to never briefly V
^~%:(ng)ite(V→V):^%{.f.%}ngi%{t%}e**           PastTenseVI; ! to lack the quality of V 
^–pagite(V→V):^pagi%{t%}e**                    PastTenseVI; ! for there not to be much V-ness
^–ketiite(V→V):^ketii%{t%}e**                  PastTenseVI; ! to not tend to V 
^–llgite(V→V):^llgi%{t%}e**                    PastTenseVI; ! to V poorly
^–llgiite(V→V):^llgii%{t%}e**                  PastTenseVI; ! to become a poor V-er
^@~%:(i/u)mangite(V→V):^%{.f.%}umangi%{t%}e**  PastTenseVI; ! to not have V-ed
^–pagumangite(V→V):^pagumangi%{t%}e**          PastTenseVI; ! to not have V-ed so much
^@~fniite(V→V):^%{.f.%}nii%{t%}e**             PastTenseVI; ! to not cause one to V
^@~fnaanghite(V→V):^%{.f.%}naanghi%{t%}e*      PastTenseVI; ! to not V in the future; won't V
^–pagnaanghite(V→V):^pagnaanghi%{t%}e**        PastTenseVI; ! to not V too much, very much in the future 
^@–nghite(V→V):^nghi%{t%}e**                   PastTenseVI; ! to not V
^+panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                PastTenseVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^–panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                PastTenseVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^+pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**            PastTenseVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**            PastTenseVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–llghite(V→V):^llghi%{t%}e**                  PastTenseVI; ! to not V
^+pagningite(V→V):^pagningi%{t%}e**            PastTenseVI; ! to not be able to V; cannot V
^+yaghqiite(V→V):^yaghqii%{t%}e**              PastTenseVI; ! to not to have to V
^@~f–yiite(V→V):^%{.f.%}yii%{t%}e**            PastTenseVI; ! to poorly V habitually
^+yugniite(V→V):^yugnii%{t%}e**                PastTenseVI; ! to not find it easy to V; to not want to V
^@~fnanigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}nanigh                 PastTenseIV; ! to cease V-ing; to stop V-ing; to quit V-ing
^@~fnanighqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}nanighqe             PastTenseII; ! to make one cease V-ing


!==================
LEXICON PastTenseII
!==================
0:0                            ProgressiveAspectII;
^@~–(g)kaqe(V→V):^gkaqe        ProgressiveAspectII; ! to have V-ed (him/it) 
^@~–(g)kaqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}kaqe  ProgressiveAspectII; ! to have V-ed (him/it) 
^@~–(g)kau(V→V):^%{.f.%}kau    ProgressiveAspectI;  ! to have V-ed; to have been V-ed
^@~–(g)kau(V→V):^gkau          ProgressiveAspectI;  ! to have V-ed; to have been V-ed
^@~%:(i/u)ma(V→V):^%{.f.%}uma  ProgressiveAspectI;  ! to have V-ed or been V-ed; to be in a state of having V-ed or been V-ed; to evidently have V-ed or been V-ed


!======================
LEXICON InterPastProgII
!======================
0:0                                            ProgressiveAspectII;
^@~%:(ng)igate(V→V):^%{.f.%}iga%{t%}e**        ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to never V; to not be V-ing at the present time
^@laaghigate(V→V):^laaghiga%{t%}e**            ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to seldom V; to infrequently V; to not V enough; inadequately V
^–pagigate(V→V):^pagiga%{t%}e**                ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to V infrequently; to seldom V 
^–qiigate(V→V):^qiiga%{t%}e**                  ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to never briefly V
^~%:(ng)ite(V→V):^%{.f.%}ngi%{t%}e**           ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to lack the quality of V 
^–pagite(V→V):^pagi%{t%}e**                    ProgressiveAspectVI; ! for there not to be much V-ness
^–ketiite(V→V):^ketii%{t%}e**                  ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not tend to V 
^–llgite(V→V):^llgi%{t%}e**                    ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to V poorly
^–llgiite(V→V):^llgii%{t%}e**                  ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to become a poor V-er
^@~%:(i/u)mangite(V→V):^%{.f.%}umangi%{t%}e**  ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not have V-ed
^–pagumangite(V→V):^pagumangi%{t%}e**          ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not have V-ed so much
^@~fniite(V→V):^%{.f.%}nii%{t%}e**             ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not cause one to V
^@~fnaanghite(V→V):^%{.f.%}naanghi%{t%}e*      ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not V in the future; won't V
^–pagnaanghite(V→V):^pagnaanghi%{t%}e**        ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not V too much, very much in the future 
^@–nghite(V→V):^nghi%{t%}e**                   ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not V
^+panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^–panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^+pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**            ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**            ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–llghite(V→V):^llghi%{t%}e**                  ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not V
^+pagningite(V→V):^pagningi%{t%}e**            ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not be able to V; cannot V
^+yaghqiite(V→V):^yaghqii%{t%}e**              ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not to have to V
^@~f–yiite(V→V):^%{.f.%}yii%{t%}e**            ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to poorly V habitually
^+yugniite(V→V):^yugnii%{t%}e**                ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not find it easy to V; to not want to V
^@~fnanigh(V→V):^%{.f.%}nanigh                 ProgressiveAspectIV; ! to cease V-ing; to stop V-ing; to quit V-ing
^@~fnanighqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}nanighqe             ProgressiveAspectII; ! to make one cease V-ing


!==========================
LEXICON ProgressiveAspectII
!==========================
0:0                                    InterProgFutII;
^~(g)aqe(V→V):^%{.f.%}aqe              InterProgFutII; ! to be currently V-ing; to V now and then; to always V
^~(g)aqlaatagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}aqlaatagh  InterProgFutIV; ! to be V-ing again, one more time 
